apertium-cy-en.cy.dix
    <pardef n="/drwg__adj">
      <e>
	<par n="initial-d"/>
        <p>
          <l>rwg</l>
          <r>rwg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<par n="initial-g_d"/>
        <p>
          <l>waeth</l>
          <r>rwg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<par n="initial-g_d"/>
        <p>
          <l>waethaf</l>
          <r>rwg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/wfn__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wfn</l>
          <r>wfn<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yfnach</l>
          <r>wfn<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yfnaf</l>
          <r>wfn<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tl/awd__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>awd</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oted</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otach</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otaf</l>
          <r>awd<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e/ang__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hangach</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>angaf</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="da__adj">
      <e>
	<par n="initial-d"/>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<par n="initial-g_null"/>
        <p>
          <l>well</l>
          <r>da<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="initial-g_null"/>
        <p>
          <l>orau</l>
          <r>da<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyn/nes__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nes</l>
          <r>nes<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hesach</l>
          <r>nes<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hesaf</l>
          <r>nes<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aml/wg__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wg</l>
          <r>wg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ycach</l>
          <r>wg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ycaf</l>
          <r>wg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="caredig__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hu/awdl__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>awdl</l>
          <r>awdl<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>otled</l>
          <r>awdl<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwly/b__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ped</l>
          <r>b<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="te/g__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ced</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tl/ws__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ws</l>
          <r>ws<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ysed</l>
          <r>ws<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bu/dr__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dr</l>
          <r>dr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tred</l>
          <r>dr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/gr__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gr</l>
          <r>gr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>cred</l>
          <r>gr<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


<!-- verbs -->

	<pardef n="ddaru__vaux">
	  <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="invariant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ffederal"><i>ffederal</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amlwg"><i>aml</i><par n="aml/wg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cynnes"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yn</i><par n="cyn/nes__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i/><par n="da__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drwg"><i/><par n="/drwg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dwfn"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/wfn__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eang"><i>e</i><par n="e/ang__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tlawd"><par n="initial-t"/><i>l</i><par n="tl/awd__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="absoliwt"><i>absoliwt</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adeiladol"><i>adeiladol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="agoredig"><i>agoredig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Americanaidd"><i>Americanaidd</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amhleidiol"><i>amhleidiol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amlygedig"><i>amlygedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anaddasedig"><i>anaddasedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anferth"><i>anferth</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anghydwedd"><i>anghydwedd</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anghyson"><i>anghyson</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="annegatif"><i>annegatif</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anorchfygol"><i>anorchfygol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="araf-ei-symud"><i>araf-ei-symud</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arferol"><i>arferol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="artistig"><i>artistig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="atodedig"><i>atodedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bendigedig"><par n="initial-b"/><i>endigedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="boddhaol"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oddhaol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="buddiol"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uddiol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="budr"><par n="initial-b"/><i>u</i><par n="bu/dr__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hagr"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/gr__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cadarn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>adarn</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="caniataol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aniataol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cosmopolitan"><par n="initial-c"/><i>osmopolitan</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ceugrwm"><par n="initial-c"/><i>eugrwm</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="clos"><par n="initial-c"/><i>los</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cost-effeithiol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ost-effeithiol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cronnus"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ronnus</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yd</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfain"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfain</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyffredin"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yffredin</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfredol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfredol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cyhoeddus"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yhoeddus</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cymesur"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ymesur</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cynenedigol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ynenedigol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cynrychioliadol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ynrychioliadol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cytûn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ytûn</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="darllenedig"><par n="initial-d"/><i>arllenedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="deallusol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eallusol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="derbyniedig"><par n="initial-d"/><i>erbyniedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dewr"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ewr</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dibynnol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ibynnol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diflanedig"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iflanedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dilynedig"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ilynedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dirymedig"><par n="initial-d"/><i>irymedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diwydiannol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iwydiannol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dwyreiniol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>wyreiniol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dymunol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ymunol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eglur"><i>eglur</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eithaf"><i>eithaf</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="epidemiolegol"><i>epidemiolegol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="etifeddol"><i>etifeddol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fforddiadwy"><i>fforddiadwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ffyrnig"><i>ffyrnig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gofodol"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ofodol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gorllewinol"><par n="initial-g"/><i>orllewinol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwahân"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wahân</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gweithgar"><par n="initial-g"/><i>weithgar</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwlyb"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wly</i><par n="gwly/b__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwreiddiol"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wreiddiol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwych"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wych</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hecsadegol"><i>hecsadegol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hoff"><i>hoff</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="huawdl"><i>hu</i><par n="hu/awdl__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hyfforddedig"><i>hyfforddedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ideolegol"><i>ideolegol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iterus"><i>iterus</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lletraws"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>etraws</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="llusgadwy"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>usgadwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marsiandïol"><par n="initial-m"/><i>arsiandïol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modern"><par n="initial-m"/><i>odern</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oediedig"><i>oediedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="penbaladr"><par n="initial-p"/><i>enbaladr</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="positif"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ositif</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhaeadrol"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>aeadrol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhonc"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>onc</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sefydlog"><i>sefydlog</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="statudol"><i>statudol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tebyg"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ebyg</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teg"><par n="initial-t"/><i>e</i><par n="te/g__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tlws"><par n="initial-t"/><i>l</i><par n="tl/ws__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trionglog"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rionglog</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="unedol"><i>unedol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ymarferol"><i>ymarferol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ddaru"><i>ddaru</i><par n="ddaru__vaux"/></e>
	<e lm="dwn i ddim"><i>dwn<b/>i<b/>ddim</i><par n="ddaru__vaux"/></e>
